src/subjunction-smj-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2 
! or any later version.

! Subjunction
! ===========

LEXICON Subjunction
ahte	Cs ;
at	Cs ;
dade	Cs ;
dadi Cs ;
danen	Cs ;
dasik	Cs ;
degu	Cs ;
degå Cs ;
 dagu	Cs ; !XXX se degu
desik	Cs ;
gå	Cs ;
ihka	Cs ;
juhte	Cs ;
juhti Cs ;
jus	Cs ;
jut	Cs ;
made Cs ;
men	Cs ;
nåv% gåk	Cs ;
vaj		Cs ;
vaják  Cs ;
!valla	Cs ; CC only.
val    Cs ;
vájk	Cs ;
vájku	Cs ;
vajku Cs ;
ájnat	Cs ;
sihke Cs ;
sigi Cs ;
åvddål% gå Cs ;
åvddåla% gå Cs ;


LEXICON Cs 
+CS:%>0 # ;
